test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-muorr_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - muõrr e-stem puu: # Noun - full paradigm
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom: muõrr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen: muõr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc: muõr
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill: muõʹrˈre
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc: muõrâst
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com: muõrin
     muõrr+N+Ess: muõrrân
     muõrr+N+Par: muõrrâd
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe: [muõrtaa, muõrtää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom: muõr
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen: muõri
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc: muõrid
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill: muõrid
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc: muõrin
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com: muõrivuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe: [muõritaa, muõritää]
#PxSg1
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: muõrram
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [muõrran, muõran]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [muõrran, muõran]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: muõrˈrsan
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [muõˈrstan, muõrstan]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: muõrinan
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxSg1: muõrˈrnan
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxSg1: muõrrnad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: [muõrrantaa, muõrrantää, muõrantaa, muõrantää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [muõrran, muõran]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [muõrään, muõraan]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [muõrään, muõraan]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [muõrään, muõraan]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: muõrinan
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [muõräänvuiʹm, muõraanvuiʹm]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: [muõrääntaa, muõrääntää, muõraantaa, muõraantää]

#PxSg2
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: muõrrad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: muõrad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: muõrad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: muõrˈrsad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [muõˈrstad, muõrstad]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: muõrinad
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxSg2: muõrˈrnad
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxSg2: muõrrnad
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: [muõradtaa, muõradtää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: muõrad
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [muõrääd, muõraad]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [muõrääd, muõraad]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [muõrääd, muõraad]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: muõrinad
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [muõräädvuiʹm, muõraadvuiʹm]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: [muõräädtaa, muõräädtää, muõraadtaa, muõraadtää]

#PxSg3
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: muõrrâs
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: muõrâs
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: muõrâs
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: muõrˈrses
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [muõˈrstes, muõrstes]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: muõrines
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxSg3: muõrˈrnes
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxSg3: muõrrnes
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: [muõrâstaa, muõrâstää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: muõrâs
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: muõrees
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: muõrees
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: muõrees
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: muõrines
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: muõreesvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: [muõreestaa, muõreestää]

#PxPl1
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: muõrrâm
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [muõrrân, muõrân]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: [muõrrân, muõrân]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: muõrˈrseen
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [muõˈrsteen, muõrsteen]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: muõrineen
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxPl1: muõrˈrneen
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxPl1: muõrrneed
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: [muõrrântaa, muõrrântää, muõrântaa, muõrântää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: [muõrrân, muõrân]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: muõreen
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: muõreen
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: muõreen
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: muõrineen
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: muõreenvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: [muõreentaa, muõreentää]

#PxPl2
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: muõrrâd
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: muõrâd
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: muõrâd
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: muõrˈrseed
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [muõˈrsteed, muõrsteed]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: muõrineed
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxPl2: muõrˈrneed
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxPl2: muõrrneed
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: [muõrâdtaa, muõrâdtää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: muõrâd
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: muõreed
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: muõreed
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: muõreed
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: muõrineed
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: muõreedvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: [muõreedtaa, muõreedtää]

#PxPl3
     muõrr+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: muõrrâz
     muõrr+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: muõrâz
     muõrr+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: muõrâz
     muõrr+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: muõrˈrseez
     muõrr+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [muõˈrsteez, muõrsteez]
     muõrr+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: muõrineez
     muõrr+N+Ess+PxPl3: muõrˈrneez
#     muõrr+N+Par+PxPl3: muõrrneez
     muõrr+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: [muõrâztaa, muõrâztää]
     muõrr+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: muõrâz
     muõrr+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: muõreez
     muõrr+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: muõreez
     muõrr+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: muõreez
     muõrr+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: muõrineez
     muõrr+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: muõreezvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: [muõreeztaa, muõreeztää]
#
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: muõrâž
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: muõrže
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: muõržen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: muõržed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: muõʹre
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: muõʹre
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [muõʹretaa, muõʹretää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: muõʹrein
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: muõʹrest
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: muõʹre
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: muõʹrei
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: muõʹreid
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: muõʹreid
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: muõʹrein
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: muõʹreivuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [muõʹreitaa, muõʹreitää]
# Diminutive possessa require proof-reading
# It maybe that the letter ž must be removed from all forms,
# even though it does occur in Leudd forms muõrâžam, muõrâžamâ...
# If the ž is removed, the entailed distinction between forms will
# be that diminutive forms are simply weaker stem, which in places
# renders no distinction at all.
#PxSg1
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: muõržam
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: muõržan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: muõržan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: muõržesan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: muõržestan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: muõržinan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxSg1: muõrženan
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxSg1: muõrženad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: [muõržantaa, muõržantää]

     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: muõržan

     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [muõržään, muõržaan]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [muõržään, muõržaan]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [muõržään, muõržaan]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: muõržinan
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [muõržäänvuiʹm, muõržaanvuiʹm]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: [muõržääntaa, muõržääntää]

#PxSg2
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: muõržad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: muõržad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: muõržad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: muõržesad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: muõržestad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: muõržinad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxSg2: muõrženad
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxSg2: muõrženad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: [muõržadtaa, muõržadtää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: muõržad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [muõržääd, muõržaad]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [muõržääd, muõržaad]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [muõržääd, muõržaad]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: muõržinad
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [muõržäädvuiʹm, muõržaadvuiʹm]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: [muõržäädtaa, muõržäädtää, muõraadtaa, muõraadtää]

#PxSg3
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: muõržâs
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: muõržâs
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: muõržâs
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: muõržeses
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [muõržestes, muõrstes]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: muõržines
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxSg3: muõrženes
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxSg3: muõrženes
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: [muõržâstaa, muõržâstää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: muõržâs
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: muõržees
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: muõržees
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: muõržees
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: muõržines
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: muõržeesvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: [muõržeestaa, muõržeestää]

#PxPl1
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: muõržâm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: muõržân
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: muõržân
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: muõržeseen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: muõržesteen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: muõržineen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxPl1: muõrženeen
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxPl1: muõrženeed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: [muõržântaa, muõržântää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: muõržân

     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: muõržeen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: muõržeen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: muõržeen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: muõržineen
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: muõržeenvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: [muõržeentaa, muõržeentää]

#PxPl2
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: muõržâd
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: muõržâd
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: muõržâd
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: muõržeseed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: muõržesteed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: muõržineed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxPl2: muõrneed
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxPl2: muõrneed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: [muõržâdtaa, muõržâdtää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: muõržâd
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: muõržeed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: muõržeed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: muõržeed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: muõržineed
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: muõržeedvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: [muõržeedtaa, muõržeedtää]

#PxPl3
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: muõržâz
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: muõržâz
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: muõržâz
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: muõržâseez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: muõržâsteez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: muõržineez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess+PxPl3: muõržâneez
#     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par+PxPl3: muõrženeez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: [muõržâztaa, muõržâztää]
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: muõržâz
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: muõržeez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: muõržeez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: muõržeez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: muõržineez
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: muõržeezvuiʹm
     muõrr+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: [muõržeeztaa, muõržeeztää]
